Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-142
Harlan.

The county of Harlan is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range twenty, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range seventeen, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township four, north, of range seventeen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township four, north, of range twenty, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 24, p. 217;

R.S.1913, § 855;

C.S.1922, § 757;

C.S.1929, § 25-144;

R.S.1943, § 22-142.